Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8369.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-38-7 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-38 entitled "Inspection
of Motor Vehicles" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-38-7. Operation of official stations.
(a) No permit for an official station shall be assigned or transferred or used at any location
other than designated in it, and the permit shall be posted in a conspicuous place at the designated
location.
(b) The state-certified person operating an official inspection station shall issue a certificate
of inspection and approval upon an official form to the owner of a vehicle upon inspection of the
vehicle and determining that its equipment required under the provisions of this chapter is in good
condition and proper adjustment, otherwise, no certificate shall be issued. A record and report shall
be made of every inspection and every certificate issued. The records shall be kept available for
review by those employees of the department of revenue that the director may designate.
(c) The following fees shall be charged for inspection and issuance of certificate of
inspection and approval:
(1) For every vehicle with a registered gross weight of not more than eight thousand five
hundred pounds (8,500 lbs.), the fee shall be included with the fee charged pursuant to § 31-47.1-
11;
(2) For every vehicle of a registered gross weight of more than eight thousand five hundred
pounds (8,500 lbs.) or more, except trailers, fifteen dollars ($15.00);

(3) For every motorcycle and electrically powered vehicle, eleven dollars ($11.00) fifteen
dollars ($15.00);
(4) For every trailer or semi-trailer with a registered gross weight of more than one
thousand pounds (1,000 lbs.), eleven dollars ($11.00); and
(5) Provided, that for the inspection of vehicles used for the transportation of persons for
hire, as provided in § 31-22-12, and subject to an inspection pursuant to chapter 47.1 of this title,
the fee shall be included with the fee charged pursuant to § 31-47.1-11.
(d) The director of the department of revenue may establish a state inspection facility at
which any motor vehicle may be reinspected at no cost to the owner. The state inspection facility
may inspect all public conveyance vehicles or these inspections may be otherwise provided for by
the director, or any other vehicles which, in the opinion of the director of revenue, or his or her
designee, require specific testing to ensure for the health and safety of the general public.
(e) Any other inspections or activities which may be required to be performed at a state
inspection facility may be performed at any official inspection station if determined by the director.
SECTION 2. Section 31-47.1-11 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-47.1 entitled "Motor
Vehicle Emissions Inspection Program" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-47.1-11. Fees.
(a) Beginning in fiscal year 2015 until January 1, 2027, a fee of fifty-five dollars ($55.00)
is to be charged for each motor vehicle inspected. The amount of fees collected shall provide for
the cost of the inspection, the costs of administering the motor vehicle emissions inspection
program and other costs provided by law. The fee must be paid for each motor vehicle inspected at
an emissions inspection station at the time of the inspection and is payable whether a compliance
certificate, waiver certificate, or no certificate is issued. There shall be no fee charged for one
reinspection of a vehicle that failed an initial inspection when the reinspection is conducted at the
AIRS that conducted the initial inspection.
Of the fifty-five dollars ($55.00) fee, nineteen dollars ($19.00) shall be retained by the
inspection station owner to cover the costs of performing the inspection. The remaining thirty-six
dollars ($36.00) shall be remitted to the program manager. The program manager shall retain no
more than four dollars ($4.00) of the fee and remit no less than thirty-two dollars ($32.00) for
deposit in the Rhode Island highway maintenance account. Be it further provided that twenty
dollars ($20.00) generated from the fee be deposited into the Rhode Island highway maintenance
fund according to the schedule provided in subsection (b) of § 39-18.1-5. The general assembly
shall annually appropriate such sums as may be required to cover the costs of administering the
program by the division of motor vehicles and the department of environmental management.
LC006217 - Page 2 of 4

(b) [Deleted by P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 21, § 6].
(c)(1) On and after January 1, 2027, a fee of seventy-five dollars ($75.00) is to be charged
for each motor vehicle inspected. The amount of fees collected shall provide for the cost of the
inspection, the costs of administering the motor vehicle emissions inspection program and other
costs provided by law. The fee shall be paid for each motor vehicle inspected at an emissions
inspection station at the time of the inspection and is payable whether a compliance certificate,
waiver certificate, or no certificate is issued. There shall be no fee charged for one reinspection of
a vehicle that failed an initial inspection when the reinspection is conducted at the AIRS that
conducted the initial inspection.
(2) Of the seventy-five dollar ($75.00) fee charged pursuant to the provisions of subsection
(c)(1) of this section, twenty-four dollars ($24.00) shall be retained by the inspection station owner
to cover the costs of performing the inspection. The remaining fifty-one dollars ($51.00) shall be
remitted to the program manager. The program manager shall retain no more than four dollars
($4.00) of the fee and remit no less than thirty-seven dollars ($37.00) for deposit in the Rhode
Island highway maintenance account. Twenty dollars ($20.00) generated from the fee shall be
deposited into the Rhode Island highway maintenance fund according to the schedule in § 39-18.1-
5(b). The remaining ten dollars ($10.00) shall be deposited directly to Rhode Island public transit
authority (RIPTA). The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sums as may be required
to cover the costs of administering the program by the division of motor vehicles and the department
of environmental management.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
========
LC006217
========
LC006217 - Page 3 of 4